Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-301.02
District court judicial districts; described; number of judges.

The State of Nebraska shall be divided into the following twelve district court judicial districts:

District No. 1 shall contain the counties of Saline, Jefferson, Gage, Thayer, Johnson, Pawnee, Nemaha, Fillmore, Richardson, and Otoe;

District No. 2 shall contain the counties of Sarpy and Cass;

District No. 3 shall contain the county of Lancaster;

District No. 4 shall contain the county of Douglas;

District No. 5 shall contain the counties of Merrick, Platte, Colfax, Boone, Nance, Hamilton, Polk, York, Butler, Seward, and Saunders;

District No. 6 shall contain the counties of Dixon, Dakota, Cedar, Burt, Thurston, Dodge, and Washington;

District No. 7 shall contain the counties of Knox, Cuming, Antelope, Pierce, Wayne, Madison, and Stanton;

District No. 8 shall contain the counties of Cherry, Keya Paha, Brown, Rock, Blaine, Loup, Custer, Boyd, Holt, Garfield, Wheeler, Valley, Greeley, Sherman, and Howard;

District No. 9 shall contain the counties of Buffalo and Hall;

District No. 10 shall contain the counties of Adams, Phelps, Kearney, Harlan, Franklin, Webster, Clay, and Nuckolls;

District No. 11 shall contain the counties of Hooker, Thomas, Arthur, McPherson, Logan, Keith, Perkins, Lincoln, Dawson, Chase, Hayes, Frontier, Gosper, Dundy, Hitchcock, Red Willow, and Furnas; and

District No. 12 shall contain the counties of Sioux, Dawes, Box Butte, Sheridan, Scotts Bluff, Morrill, Garden, Banner, Kimball, Cheyenne, Grant, and Deuel.

In the fourth district there shall be eighteen judges of the district court. In the third district there shall be eight judges of the district court. In the second, fifth, ninth, eleventh, and twelfth districts there shall be four judges of the district court. In the first and sixth districts there shall be three judges of the district court. In the seventh, eighth, and tenth districts there shall be two judges of the district court.

Laws 1911, c. 5, § 1, p. 70;

Laws 1913, c. 203, § 1, p. 623;

R.S.1913, § 217;

Laws 1915, c. 12, § 1, p. 64;

Laws 1917, c. 3, § 1, p. 55;

Laws 1919, c. 114, § 1, p. 278;

Laws 1921, c. 146, § 1, p. 620;

C.S.1922, § 199;

Laws 1923, c. 119, § 1, p. 283;

C.S.1929, § 5-103;

R.S.1943, § 5-105;

Laws 1961, c. 11, § 1, p. 99;

Laws 1963, c. 24, § 1, p. 125;

Laws 1965, c. 23, § 1, p. 186;

Laws 1965, c. 24, § 1, p. 189;

Laws 1969, c. 27, § 1, p. 229;

Laws 1972, LB 1301, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 1, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 618, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 121, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 287, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 516, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 5-105;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 181, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 306, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 19, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 189, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 404, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 92, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB377, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB35, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB697, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB309, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB922, § 1.

Constitutional provisions, see Article V, sections 10 and 11, Constitution of Nebraska.

Rights of newly appointed judges under merit plan of judicial selection governed by applicable laws in effect at time of appointment and qualification. Garrotto v. McManus, 185 Neb. 644, 177 N.W.2d 570 (1970).

Omission of county in amendatory act providing for judicial districts did not exclude county from the operation of the laws or judicial authority of the state. State ex rel. Reed v. Grimes, 98 Neb. 762, 154 N.W 544 (1915).